Washington statutes.
RCW 18.54.090

Administrative procedures—Minimum fees.

The board is an administrative agency of the state of Washington, and the provisions of the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW as amended from time to time, govern the conduct and proceedings of the board. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to give the board the power to set or recommend a minimum schedule of fees to be charged by licensed optometrist.

[ 1963 c 25 s 9.]